src/fst/morphology/ext-TRmorph/morph.lexc
LEXICON V_CausAt_AorAr
%<V%>:@RB           VCausAtAorArCont;
#if (ALLOW_MREDUP == 1)
%<V%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB   VCausAtAorArCont;
#endif

LEXICON VCausAtAorArCont
                        VAorAr;
                        VCausAt;
                        VNoCausNoAorCont;
                        AbilPartial;

LEXICON VCausAt
%<caus%>:^At@MB        VCont;

LEXICON V_Rcp_CausAr_AorAr
%<V%>:@RB           VRcpCausArAorArCont;
#if (ALLOW_MREDUP == 1)
%<V%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB   VRcpCausArAorArCont;
#endif

LEXICON VRcpCausArAorArCont
                        VRcp;
                        VAorAr;
                        VCausAr;
                        VNoCausNoAorCont;
                        AbilPartial;

LEXICON V_Rcp_CausIr_AorAr
%<V%>:@RB                   VRcpAorArCausIrCont;
#if (ALLOW_MREDUP == 1)
%<V%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB    VRcpAorArCausIrCont;
#endif

LEXICON VRcpAorArCausIrCont
            VAorAr;
            VRcp;
            VCausIr;
            VNoCausNoAorCont;
            VNoAorCont;
            AbilPartial;

!
LEXICON V_CausAr_AorAr
%<V%>:@RB           VCausArAorArCont;
#if (ALLOW_MREDUP == 1)
%<V%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB   VCausArAorArCont;
#endif


LEXICON VCausArAorArCont
                        VAorAr;
                        VCausAr;
                        VNoCausNoAorCont;
                        AbilPartial;

LEXICON VCausAr
%<caus%>:^Ar@MB        VCont;

!
LEXICON V_CausArt_AorAr
%<V%>:@RB           VCausArtAorArCont;
#if (ALLOW_MREDUP == 1)
%<V%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB   VCausArtAorArCont;
#endif

LEXICON VCausArtAorArCont
                        VAorAr;
                        VCausArt;
                        VNoCausNoAorCont;
                        AbilPartial;

LEXICON VCausArt
%<caus%>:^Art@MB        VCont;

!
LEXICON V_CausIt_AorAr
%<V%>:@RB           VCausItAorArCont;
#if (ALLOW_MREDUP == 1)
%<V%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB   VCausItAorArCont;
#endif

LEXICON VCausItAorArCont
                        VAorAr;
                        VCausIt;
                        VNoCausNoAorCont;
                        AbilPartial;

!
LEXICON V_Rcp_CausDir_AorAr
%<V%>:@RB           VRcpCausDirAorArCont;
#if (ALLOW_MREDUP == 1)
%<V%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB   VRcpCausDirAorArCont;
#endif

LEXICON VRcpCausDirAorArCont
                        VAorAr;
                        VCausDir;
                        VRcp;
                        VNoCausNoAorCont;
                        AbilPartial;

LEXICON V_Rfl_CausDir_AorAr
%<V%>:@RB           VRflCausDirAorArCont;
#if (ALLOW_MREDUP == 1)
%<V%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB   VRflCausDirAorArCont;
#endif

LEXICON VRflCausDirAorArCont
                        VAorAr;
                        VCausDir;
                        VRfl;
                        VNoCausNoAorCont;
                        AbilPartial;

LEXICON V_Rfl_Rcp_CausDir_AorAr
%<V%>:@RB           VRflRcpCausDirAorArCont;
#if (ALLOW_MREDUP == 1)
%<V%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB   VRflRcpCausDirAorArCont;
#endif


LEXICON VRflRcpCausDirAorArCont
                        VAorAr;
                        VCausDir;
                        VRcp;
                        VRfl;
                        VNoCausNoAorCont;
                        AbilPartial;

LEXICON V_CausIrreg_AorAr
%<V%>:@RB           VCausIrregAorArCont;
#if (ALLOW_MREDUP == 1)
%<V%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB   VCausIrregAorArCont;
#endif

LEXICON VCausIrregAorArCont
                        VAorAr;
                        VNoCausNoAorCont;
                        AbilPartial;

LEXICON V_Rcp_CausIrreg_AorAr
%<V%>:@RB           VRcpCausIrregAorArCont;
#if (ALLOW_MREDUP == 1)
%<V%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB   VRcpCausIrregAorArCont;
#endif

LEXICON V_Rfl_CausIrreg_AorAr
%<V%>:@RB           VRflCausIrregAorArCont;
#if (ALLOW_MREDUP == 1)
%<V%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB   VRflCausIrregAorArCont;
#endif

LEXICON VRflCausIrregAorArCont
                        VRfl;
                        VAorAr;
                        VNoCausNoAorCont;
                        AbilPartial;

LEXICON VRcpCausIrregAorArCont
                        VRcp;
                        VAorAr;
                        VNoCausNoAorCont;
                        AbilPartial;

! LEXICON V_Rfl_Rcp_CausIrreg_AorAr

!
! Here more regular stuff after stem irregularities
!

LEXICON VCausRegular
%<caus%>:@CAUS@MB      VCausLoop;

LEXICON VCausLoop
            VCausRegular;
            VCausRegularCont;

LEXICON VCausRegularCont
            VPassive;
            VPassiveCont;
            VNegative;
            Vderiv;
            AbilPartial;

LEXICON VPassive
%<pass%>:^(I)@LN@MB       VPassiveCont;
%<pass%>:^(I)@LN@MB       VPassive2;

! Double passive. TODO: This should only be allowed for transitive verbs.
! currently we do not mark the verbs for transitivity.
!
LEXICON VPassive2
%<pass%>:^(I)@LN2@MB       VPassiveCont;

LEXICON  VPassiveCont
                          VCabilNeg;
                          VNegative;
                          VNegativeCont;
                          AbilPartial;
                          D_yAsI;
!

LEXICON VCabilNeg
%<abil%>:^(y)^A@MB     VNegative;

!

LEXICON VNegative
%<neg%>:m^NNS^A@MB      VNegativeCont;
%<neg%>:m^NNS^A@MB      CVNeg;

LEXICON VNegativeCont
                    VComp;
                    AbilPartial;
                    NonFiniteVerb;

! This is a very rare case, where the clictc dA intervenes between the
! main verb and the VComp -(y)Abil. In this case main verb is suffixed
! with -(y)A, the rest 'bil-' follows the clitic. For example,
! 'Görüştürüleme-ye de biliyor muydunuz ?'
!
LEXICON AbilPartial
%<partial%>:^(y)^A@MB ENDLEX;
! 0:^(y)^A@MB ENDLEX;



LEXICON VComp
%<abil%>:^(y)^Abil@MB VCompCont;
%<iver%>:^(y)^Iv^NSer@MB VCompCont;
%<adur%>:^(y)^Ad^NSur@MB VCompCont;
%<agel%>:^(y)^Ag^NSel@MB VCompCont;
%<agor%>:^(y)^Agör@MB VCompCont;
%<akal%>:^(y)^Ak^NSal@MB VCompCont;
%<ayaz%>:^(y)^Ay^NSaz@MB VCompCont;
! %<akoy%>%<V%>:^(y)^Akoy@MB VCompCont;

LEXICON VCompCont
                    VCausRegular;
                    VCausRegularCont;
                    NonFiniteVerb;

LEXICON     NonFiniteVerb
                    NonFiniteVerbNoAor;
                    TAMAor;

LEXICON     NonFiniteVerbNoAor
                    VTAM;
                    SubSuffixes;

! Tense / aspec / modality markers

LEXICON VTAM
%<evid%>:m^Iş@MB          TAMNarrCont;
%<fut%>:^(y)^Ac^A^k@MB    TAMFutCont;
%<obl%>:m^Al^I@MB         TAMOblCont;
%<impf%>:m^Akt^A@MB       TAMMaktaCont; ! TODO: -maktayızdır ??
%<cont%>:^(I)y^NSor@MB       TAMContCont;
%<past%>:^D^I@MB          TAMDICont;
%<cond%>:s^A@MB           TAMCondCont;
%<cond%>:^(y)^A@MB        TAMCondYACont; ! this is informal use
%<opt%>:^(y)^A@MB         TAMOptCont;
%<imp%>:0@MB              TAMImpCont;

LEXICON TAMAor      ! this is the regular one
%<aor%>:^(I)r@MB          AorCont;

LEXICON TAMNarrCont
            TAMg1Cont;
            CVcesinePagr;
            VerbalAdj;

LEXICON AorCont
            TAMg1Cont;  ! TODO/CHECK: not allow -DIr: okurdur ??
            CVcesinePagr;
            VerbalAdj;
!            DerivNCont;
!            DerivJCont;

LEXICON TAMFutCont
            TAMg1Cont;
            VerbalAdj;

LEXICON TAMOblCont
            TAMg1Cont;

LEXICON TAMMaktaCont
            TAMg1Cont;
!            VerbalAdj;

LEXICON TAMContCont
            TAMg1Cont;
!            VerbalAdj;

LEXICON TAMg1Cont
                        PAgrG1;
                        PAgrG1p3;
                        TAMg1DIr;
                        CplAll;
%<q%>:@miSPCm^I@MB      TAMG1QCont;
#if (PREDICATE_WITHOUT_PAGR == 1)
                        ENDLEX;
#endif

! This is for cases like: 'birleşmiş milletler', 
! 'okumakta olan oğrenci', 'basılıyor olan dergiler'
! 'adam olacak çocuk', 'ele gelir sonuç' etc.
! some of these (-makta -yor) are restricted to be used 
! before an auxiliary verb (ol, bul) but some can stand alone.
! These are, after all, some sort of subordination. The result 
! is something that complements a noun, so we mark it as 
! an adjective. Especially -acak is confusing as we also have 
! an explicit subordinating suffix.
!
! We assume that these forms behave just like any other adjective, 
! although they may be more conservative about combining with all
! suffixes that attach to adjectives (particularly, see the note 
! above on -makta -yor).
!
LEXICON VerbalAdj
#if (ZERO_DERIV == 1)
%<%0%>%<Adj%>:@MB       AdjCont;
#else
                        AdjCont;
#endif


LEXICON TAMG1QCont
                PAgrG1;
                CplEvid;
                CplPast;
                TAMG1QDIr;

LEXICON TAMG1QDIr
%<dir%>:^D^NS^Ir@MB            TAMG1QDIrCont;

LEXICON TAMG1QDIrCont
%<3p%>:l^Ar@MB              ENDLEX;



LEXICON PAgrG1     ! <3p>:lAr is treated separately
%<1s%>:^(y)^NS^Im@MB       PAgrG1Cont;
%<2s%>:s^NS^In@MB          PAgrG1Cont;
%<3s%>:0@MB             PAgrG1Cont;
%<1p%>:^(y)^NS^Iz@MB       PAgrG1Cont;
%<2p%>:s^NS^In^Iz@MB       PAgrG1Cont;


LEXICON PAgrG1Cont
                    ENDLEX;
%<dir%>:^D^NS^Ir@MB    ENDLEX;


LEXICON  PAgrG1p3
%<3p%>:l^Ar@MB   PAgrG1p3Cont;

LEXICON PAgrG1p3Cont
                        PAgrG1Cont;        ! includes end state
                        PAgrCplAll;
%<q%>:@miSPCm^I@MB      PAgrG1p3QCont;

LEXICON PAgrG1p3QCont
                            ENDLEX;
                            DIrEnd;
                            PAgrCplAll;


LEXICON TAMg1DIr
%<dir%>:^D^NS^Ir@MB TAMg1DIrCont;

LEXICON TAMg1DIrCont
%<3p%>:s^Inl^Ar@MB     ENDLEX;

! ---------------------------
! -DI
!

LEXICON TAMDICont
            PAgrDI;
            CplPast;
            CplCond;

LEXICON PAgrDI
%<1s%>:m@MB         PAgrDICont;
%<2s%>:n@MB         PAgrDICont;
%<3s%>:0@MB         PAgrDICont;
%<1p%>:k@MB         PAgrDICont;
%<2p%>:n^Iz@MB      PAgrDICont;
%<3p%>:l^Ar@MB      PAgrDICont;

LEXICON PAgrDICont
                        ENDLEX;
                        PAgrCplCond;
                        PAgrCplPast;
%<q%>:@miSPCm^I@MB      PAgrDIQCont;

LEXICON PAgrDIQCont
                            ENDLEX;
                            PAgrCplPast2; ! we do not allow double 
                            PAgrCplCond2; ! copula after di-mi 
                            PAgrCplEvid2;
!
!
!

LEXICON TAMCondCont
                        TAMCondPAgr;
                        CplPast2;   ! no double copula sa-di-sa
                        CplEvid2;   !                  sa-mis-sa
%<q%>:@miSPCm^I@MB      TAMCondQCpl;
#if (PREDICATE_WITHOUT_PAGR == 1)
                        ENDLEX;
#endif

LEXICON TAMCondQCpl
            CplPast2;
            CplEvid2;

LEXICON TAMCondPAgr
%<1s%>:m@MB         TAMCondPAgrCont;
%<2s%>:n@MB         TAMCondPAgrCont;
%<3s%>:0@MB         TAMCondPAgrCont;
%<1p%>:k@MB         TAMCondPAgrCont;
%<2p%>:n^Iz@MB      TAMCondPAgrCont;
%<3p%>:l^Ar@MB      TAMCond3pCont;

LEXICON TAMCondPAgrCont
                        ENDLEX;
%<q%>:@miSPCm^I@MB      TAMCondQPAgrCont; ! this is somewhat odd: oku-sa-k mı

LEXICON TAMCond3pCont
                        TAMCondPAgrCont;
                        PAgrCplPast2;
                        PAgrCplEvid2;

LEXICON TAMCondQPAgrCont
                ENDLEX;
                PAgrCplPast2;
                PAgrCplEvid2;

LEXICON TAMCondYACont ! this is informal: gel-e-ydi
            CplPast2;
            CplEvid2;

!
! Optative
!

LEXICON TAMOptCont
                        OptPAgr;
%<q%>:@miSPCm^I@MB      OptQCont;
#if (PREDICATE_WITHOUT_PAGR == 1)
                        ENDLEX;
#endif

LEXICON OptQCont
%<cpl%:past%>:^(y)^D^NS^I@MB     PAgrG2End;
%<cpl%:evid%>:^(y)m^NS^Iş@MB     PAgrG1End;

! TODO: opt3s below seems to be a half-implemented feature, but not
!       clear what...

LEXICON OptPAgr
%<1s%>:^(y)^NS^Im@MB    OptPAgrCont;
%<2s%>:s^In@MB          ENDLEX;
%<3s%>:@opt3s^In@MB     OptPAgrCont;
%<1p%>:l^Im@MB          OptPAgrCont;
%<2p%>:s^NS^In^Iz@MB    ENDLEX;
%<3p%:sInlAr%>:@opt3s^Inl^Ar@MB OptPAgrCont;
%<3s%:%0%>:0@MB             OptPAgrCont; ! these two are 
%<3p%>:l^Ar@MB          OptPAgrCont; ! colloquial use
